Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-646
Special taxes; lien upon property; collection.

In every case of the levy of special taxes, the same shall be a lien on the property on which levied from date of levy and shall be due and payable to the city treasurer thirty days after such levy when not otherwise provided; and, at the time of the next certification for general revenue purposes to the county clerk, if not previously paid, the special taxes, except paving, repaving, graveling, macadamizing, and curbing or curbing and guttering shall be certified to the county clerk and by him be placed upon the tax list and be collected as other real estate taxes are collected, and be paid over to the city treasurer; and paving, repaving, graveling, macadamizing and curbing, or curbing and guttering taxes may be so certified and collected by the county treasurer at the option of said city.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 77, p. 288;

Laws 1903, c. 19, § 14, p. 245;

R.S.1913, § 4938;

Laws 1917, c. 95, § 1, p. 255;

C.S.1922, § 4106;

Laws 1925, c. 50, § 12, p. 200;

C.S.1929, § 16-635;

R.S.1943, § 16-646.

Special assessment was a lien at time of foreclosure, and could have been included in tax foreclosure proceeding. Dent v. City of North Platte, 148 Neb. 718, 28 N.W.2d 562 (1947).